Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.310

Notice of sale—Claim on proceeds.

When a person has been notified by registered mail that animals bearing the person's recorded brand have been sold by the director, the person shall present to the director a claim on the proceeds within thirty days from the receipt of the notice or the director may decide that no claim exists.

[ 2003 c 326 s 38; 1959 c 54 s 31.]